Utah statutes.
63G-6-409 (Repealed 05/01/13).   Small purchases.

Small purchases shall be defined in, and may be made in accordance with procedures established by, rules and regulations; except that the procurement requirement shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small purchase under this section.

